Missouri, session 2026, SB1061.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 34, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 34.750, to read as
follows:
34.750. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Ammunition", a loaded cartridge or shot shell
case, primer, projectile, wadding, or propellant powder with
or without a projectile;
(2) "Company", a for-profit organization, association,
corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited
partnership, limited liability partnership, or limited
liability company, including a wholly owned subsidiary,
majority-owned subsidiary, parent company, or affiliate of
those entities or associations that exists to make a profit,
not including a sole proprietorship;
(3) "Discriminate", refusing to engage in the trade of
any goods or services with an entity or association based
solely on its status as a firearm entity or firearm trade
association, refraining from continuing an existing business
relationship with the entity or association based solely on

SB 1061 2
its status as a firearm entity or firearm trade association,
or terminating an existing business relationship with the
entity or association based solely on its status as a
firearm entity or firearm trade association. This term
shall not include when the established policies of a
merchant, retail seller, or platform restricts or prohibits
the listing or selling of ammunition, firearms, or firearm
accessories or when a company's refusal to engage in the
trade of any goods or services, decision to refrain from
continuing an existing business relationship, or decision to
terminate an existing business relationship is to comply
with federal, state, or local law, policy, or regulation or
a directive by a regulatory agency or for any traditional
business reason that is specific to the customer or
potential customer and not based solely on an entity's or
association's status as a firearm entity or firearm trade
association. As used in this subdivision, the term "status
as a firearm entity or firearm trade association" includes
the provision of lawful products and services by, and the
lawful practices of, firearms entities and firearm trade
associations;
(4) "Firearm", a weapon that expels a projectile by
the action of explosive or expanding gases;
(5) "Firearm accessory", a device specifically
designed or adapted to enable an individual to wear, carry,
store, or mount a firearm on the individual or on a
conveyance and an item used in conjunction with or mounted
on a firearm that is not essential to the basic function of
the firearm. This term includes a detachable firearm
magazine;

SB 1061 3
(6) "Firearm entity", a firearm, firearm accessory, or
ammunition manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler, supplier,
retailer, or a sport shooting range;
(7) "Firearm trade association", any person,
corporation, unincorporated association, federation,
business league, or business organization that:
(a) Is not organized or operated for profit and for
which none of its net earnings inures to the benefit of any
private shareholder or individual;
(b) Has two or more firearm entities as members; and
(c) Is exempt from federal income taxation under
Section 501(a) of the United States Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as an organization described by Section 501(c) of that
code;
(8) "Public entity", as defined in section 34.600.
2. This section applies only to a contract that:
(1) Is between a public entity and a company with at
least ten full-time employees; and
(2) Has a value of at least one hundred thousand
dollars that is paid wholly or partly from public funds of
the public entity.
3. Except as provided in subsection 4 of this section,
a public entity shall not enter into a contract with a
company for the purchase of goods or services unless the
contract contains a written verification from the company
that it:
(1) Does not have a practice, policy, guidance, or
directive that discriminates against a firearm entity or
firearm trade association; and
(2) Shall not discriminate during the term of the
contract against a firearm entity or firearm trade
association.

SB 1061 4
4. This section shall not apply to a public entity
that:
(1) Contracts with a sole-source provider; or
(2) Does not receive a bid from a company that is able
to provide the written verification required by subsection 2
of this section.
✓